Utah statutes.
53A-25b-402.   Annual salary adjustments for educators.

(1)  Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall annually appropriate money to the board for the salary adjustments described in this section, including step and lane changes.

(2)  The board shall include in its annual budget request for the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind an amount of money sufficient to adjust educators' salaries as described in Subsection (3) and fund step and lane changes.

(3) (a)  The board shall determine the salary adjustment specified in Subsection (2) by:

(i)  calculating a weighted average salary adjustment for nonadministrative licensed staff adopted by the school districts of the state, with the average weighted by the number of teachers in each school district; and

(ii)  increasing the weighted average salary adjustment by 10% in any year in which teachers of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind are not ranked in the top 10 in 20-year earnings when compared to earnings of teachers in the school districts of the state.

(b)  In calculating a weighted average salary adjustment for nonadministrative licensed staff adopted by the school districts of the state under Subsection (3)(a), the board shall exclude educator salary adjustments provided pursuant to Section 53A-17a-153.

(4)  From money appropriated to the board for salary adjustments, the board shall adjust the salary schedule applicable to educators at the school each year.

